District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.02

Tax on corporations — Levy and rates.

(a)

Except as exempted under subchapter II of this chapter, for the privilege of carrying on or engaging in any trade or business within the District and of receiving income from sources within the District, there is levied:

(1)

For 1 taxable year beginning after December 31, 1974, a tax at the rate of 12% upon the taxable income of every corporation, whether domestic or foreign;

(2)

For the taxable years beginning after December 31, 1975, a tax at the rate of 9% upon the taxable income of every corporation, whether domestic or foreign, except that, effective October 1, 1984, the rate of tax shall be 10% upon the taxable income for any taxable period, except that for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1994, the rate of tax shall be 9.5%;

(3)

For the taxable years beginning after December 31, 2002, a tax at the rate of 9.5% upon the taxable income of every corporation, whether domestic or foreign.

(3A)

A surtax at the rate of 2.5% on the tax determined under paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, as applicable, for any tax period beginning after September 30, 1992.

(3B)

A surtax at the rate of 2.5%, separate from and in addition to, the surtax imposed by paragraph (3A) of this subsection, on the tax determined under paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, as applicable, for any tax period beginning after September 30, 1994.

(4)

For the taxable years beginning after December 31, 2003, a tax at the rate of 9.975% upon the taxable income of every corporation, whether domestic or foreign.

(5)

For the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2014, a tax at the rate of 9.4% upon the taxable income of every corporation, whether domestic or foreign; and

(6)

Subject to availability of funding and in accordance with § 47-181, upon the taxable income of every corporation, whether domestic or foreign, a tax at the rate of 9%, 8.75%, 8.5%, or 8.25%.

(b)

The minimum tax payable under this section shall be $250. If District gross receipts are greater than $1 million, the minimum tax payable shall be $1,000. Corporations or financial institutions including International Banking Facilities shall not be exempt from the minimum tax payable under this section even if the business or source income is exempt under other provisions of this chapter.

(c)

The taxes imposed by this section shall, during the 3 tax years beginning after June 30, 1981, be subject to the transition rules provided in § 47-2507.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 345, ch. 258, art. I, title VII, § 2
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 612, Pub. L. 90-450, title II, § 202(a)
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 178, Pub. L. 91-106, title VI, § 604(a)(1)
Dec. 15, 1971, 85 Stat. 653, Pub. L. 92-196, title IV, §§ 401, 403
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VI, § 603, 22 DCR 2111
July 27, 1976, D.C. Law 1-77, § 2, 23 DCR 1218
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 201, 24 DCR 5765
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-95, § 105(b), 27 DCR 3509
Sept. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-150, § 104, 29 DCR 3377
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 902, 30 DCR 2632
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 302(a)(1), 31 DCR 3974
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(g)(2), 34 DCR 5097
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 2(d), 36 DCR 4160
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 103(c), 41 DCR 2096
Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 301(a)(1), 41 DCR 5333
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38,§ 2702(i), 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 168, 47 DCR 520
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4102, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 802(c), 49 DCR 6968
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1002(a), 49 DCR 11664
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8072(a), 58 DCR 6226
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7012(c)(7), 61 DCR 9990
Tax rate changes, authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, see § 47-504.
Washington Convention Center Authority, collection and allocation of taxes under this section, see § 10-1203.07.
This section is referenced in § 10-1203.07, § 32-241, § 47-340.26, § 47-1807.07, § 47-1807.08, § 47-1812.08, § 47-1817.06, § 47-4215, § 47-4602, and § 50-1501.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-1807.2.
1973 Ed., § 47-1571a.
D.C. Law 13-38 rewrote subsec. (a)(3) and repealed subsec. (a)(4).
Section 2702(i)(2)(B) of D.C. Law 13-38 provided: “This paragraph shall be effective for tax years beginning after December 31, 2002.”
Section 2703(c) of D.C. Law 13-38 provided: “Section 2702(f), (h), (i), and (j) shall apply for tax years beginning after December 31, 1999.”
D.C. Law 13-91 amended subsec. (a)(4) by inserting the phrase “, and beginning on or before December 31, 2002” after the phrase “beginning on or after October 1, 1994”.
D.C. Law 14-28, added subsec. (a)(3A), and rewrote subsec. (a)(4) which had read as follows: “(4) A surtax, separate from and in addition to, the surtax imposed by paragraph (3) of this subsection, on the tax determined under paragraph (2) of this subsection at a rate of 2.5% for any tax period beginning on or after October 1, 1994, and beginning on or before December 31, 2002.”
D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (a), rewrote pars. (3) and (4).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (a)(5) and (a)(6).
Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 19-53, in section 8074 of D.C. Law 19-21, substituted “for tax years beginning after December 31, 2010” for “as of December 31, 2010”.
Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 19-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3702 to 3704 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1002(a) and 1003 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1002(a) and 1003 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 802(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1002(a) and 1003 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 8074 of D.C. Law 19-21, see § 2(b) of Revised Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-157, October 4, 2011, 58 DCR 8688).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7022(c)(7) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7012(c)(7) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7012(c)(7) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 10(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-292, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1211).
Short title: Section 8071 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle H of title VIII of the act may be cited as “Minimum Corporate and Unincorporated Franchise Tax Payable ”.
Delegation of authority under Law 5-14, see Mayor’s Order 83-190, July 25, 1983.

Sections 8073 and 8074 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided:

“Sec. 8073. Rules.

“The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issues rules to implement the provisions of this subtitle.

“Sec. 8074. Applicability.

“This subtitle shall apply as of December 31, 2010.”

Section 4104 of D.C. Law 14-28 provided: “ Section 47-1807.02(a)(3A) and (4) are repealed effective for all tax periods beginning after December 31, 2002.”

Section 4103(a) of D.C. Law 14-28 provided: “Section 4102(a) shall apply for any tax period beginning after September 30, 1992.”

Section 4103(b) of D.C. Law 14-28 provides: “Section 4102(b) shall apply for any tax period beginning after September 30, 1994”.

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: Section 306(a) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that the act shall expire 2 years after September 28, 1994, if the Board does not submit final financial requirements and a feasibility analysis to the Mayor and the Council as provided by § 10-1202.06(h).

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-1807.02a.

Mayor authorized to issue regulations: Section 401 of D.C. Law 4-150 provided that the Mayor shall issue regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 1102 of D.C. Law 5-14 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.

Audit of accounts and operation of Authority: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-1807.02a.

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: Section 2(l)(1) of D.C. Law 12-142 provided that § 306(a) of D.C. Law 10-188, providing for the expiration of that act, is repealed. Section 2(l)(2) of D.C. Law 12-142 provided that the subsection shall apply as of February 27, 1997.

Audit of accounts and operation of Authority: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-1807.02a.

Section 1003 of D.C. Law 14-307 provided: “Sec. 1003. Applicability. Section 1002 shall apply as of January 1, 2003.”